Maryland, session 2026, HB0935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
3–301.
(a) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the Commissioner shall operate a
comprehensive rehabilitative prerelease unit for women that:
(1) is a separate structure in which the services specified in § 3–303(b) of
this subtitle are provided;
(2) has security features for female incarcerated individuals who:
(i) present the least risk of violence;
(ii) present the least risk of escape; and
(iii) have a record of satisfactory institutional behavior; and
(3) matches security level on a validated gender–responsive risk measure.
(b) [(1) In determining where to place a prerelease unit for women, the
Commissioner shall determine into which area, defined by zip codes, the largest percentage
of incarcerated individuals will likely be released.
(2)] A prerelease unit for women shall be:
(1) located in [or adjacent to the zip codes identified in paragraph (1) of this
subsection] BALTIMORE CITY ON A SITE THAT IS:
(I) NOT LESS THAN 3 ACRES IN LAND AREA; AND
(II) NOT LOCATED WITHIN A 1–MILE RADIUS OF ANY EXISTING
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY; AND

HOUSE BILL 935 3
(2) ABLE TO ACCOMMODATE THE ADMINISTRATION, HOUSING,
PROGRAMMING, AND SERVICES REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR NOT FEWER
THAN 1.25 TIMES THE NUMBER OF WOMEN AT THE MARYLAND CORRECTIONAL
INSTITUTION FOR WOMEN WHO WERE ELIGIBLE FOR PRERELEASE STATUS IN
CALENDAR YEAR 2024, AS REPORTED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN ITS OCTOBER 2024
REPORT TO THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE
APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE.
(c) An incarcerated individual assigned to a prerelease unit for women may have
access to the community for any purpose described in § 3–305(a) of this subtitle.
(d) The Department shall:
(1) identify a location, acquire property, and design a site plan for the
prerelease unit for women on or before June 1, 2021;
(2) begin construction or renovation of the facility on or before September
1, 2021; and
(3) begin operating and providing services in the facility on or before June
1, 2023.
3–301.1.
(A) ON REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT, THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
SERVICES SHALL:
(1) REVIEW AND EVALUATE ANY PROPOSALS CURRENTLY IN
POSSESSION OF THE DEPARTMENT FOR COMPLIANCE WITH THE FACILITY
REQUIREMENTS IN § 3–301 OF THIS SUBTITLE BY JUNE 1, 2026;
(2) IF NO CURRENT PROPOSAL EVALUATED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SATISFIES THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 3–301 OF THIS SUBTITLE, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE EXPEDITED PROCUREMENT PROCESS UNDER § 13–108 OF
THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, ISSUE A REQUEST FOR
PROPOSALS FOR THE PLANNING, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF A PRERELEASE
UNIT FOR WOMEN, AS REQUIRED UNDER § 3–301 OF THIS SUBTITLE, BY AUGUST 1,
2026;
(3) REVIEW AND EVALUATE PROPOSALS IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
(4) AWARD A CONTRACT TO A PROVIDER AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE.

HOUSE BILL 935
(B) A REQUEST FOR PROPOSALS ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL ACCURATELY AND COMPLETELY DESCRIBE, TO THE EXTENT
PRACTICABLE, THE LOCATION, USES, AND TIMELINE FOR DELIVERABLES TOWARD
COMPLETION OF THE PROJECT.
(C) THE CONTRACT AWARDED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(4) OF THIS SECTION
TO BUILD A PRERELEASE UNIT FOR FEMALE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS SHALL:
(1) COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS IN § 3–301 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
(2) INCLUDE:
(I) HOUSING UNITS WITH DOUBLE AND SINGLE OCCUPANCY;
(II) HANDICAPPED ACCESSIBLE ROOMS, WHEELCHAIR RAMPS,
AND DESIGNATED HANDICAPPED PARKING SPACES;
(III) BATHROOMS THAT MAXIMIZE PRIVACY, DIGNITY, AND
SECURITY OF RESIDENTS, STAFF, AND VISITORS;
(IV) ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICES;
(V) INDOOR AND OUTDOOR MEETING, LOUNGE, AND VISITING
SPACES;
(VI) A CLASSROOM;
(VII) A CAREER CENTER;
(VIII) A NONEMERGENCY MEDICAL SUITE;
(IX) ON–SITE RECREATIONAL, CREATIVE, AND ATHLETIC
FACILITIES; AND
(X) ACCESS TO PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION.
3–303.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
WITH PRERELEASE STATUS AT THE MARYLAND CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION FOR
WOMEN.

HOUSE BILL 935 5
(3) “Evidence–based programs and practices” has the meaning stated in §
6–119 of this article.
(4) “GENDER–RESPONSIVE SERVICES” MEANS PROGRAMS THAT
RECOGNIZE THE SPECIFIC NEEDS OF INCARCERATED WOMEN IN PRERELEASE
STATUS REGARDING THEIR PSYCHOLOGICAL DEVELOPMENT, SOCIALIZATION,
CULTURE, EXPOSURE TO TRAUMA, AND LIFE EXPERIENCES, TO REDUCE
CRIMINOGENIC RISKS AND SUPPORT SUCCESSFUL REENTRY, RECOVERY, AND
RECIDIVISM REDUCTION.
[(3)] (5) “Innovative programs and practices” has the meaning stated in §
6–119 of this article.
(b) (1) The Commissioner shall make evidence–based and gender–responsive
services available to female incarcerated individuals [at the prerelease unit for women
required under § 3–301 of this subtitle] WITH PRERELEASE STATUS.
(2) THE SERVICES REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
PROVIDED TO ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS BEFORE THE FINAL CONSTRUCTION AND
OCCUPATION OF THE FACILITY REQUIRED UNDER § 3–301 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(c) The comprehensive rehabilitative prerelease services shall utilize
evidence–based programs and practices and innovative programs and practices to:
(1) assist female incarcerated individuals in improving their education,
upgrading vocational skills, and obtaining suitable employment through classes to earn
industry certification or community college credits, workforce training, and job placement;
(2) provide female incarcerated individuals with the opportunity to
strengthen family and community relationships through extended family leave, parenting
workshops, and family reunification assistance;
(3) provide integrative and gender–responsive services, including medical
treatment, trauma–informed counseling, mental health treatment, and substance use
disorder treatment to address overall health and trauma needs and help female
incarcerated individuals achieve stable and productive roles in society; and
(4) develop individualized and comprehensive reentry plans involving
community provider partnerships for female incarcerated individuals to reduce barriers to
obtaining housing, jobs, education, health care, childcare and child welfare, transportation,
legal advocacy, case management, and other needs.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP A PLAN TO PROVIDE
COMPREHENSIVE GENDER–RESPONSIVE SERVICES TO ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS

HOUSE BILL 935
ON–SITE AT THE MARYLAND CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION FOR WOMEN ON OR
BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 1, 2026, the
Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services shall provide a preliminary report
on the progress the Department has made to comply with Section 1 of this Act, including
any specific steps taken and dates on which specific steps were taken to the Senate Judicial
Proceedings Committee, the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the House Judiciary
Committee, and the House Appropriations Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before September 1,
2026, the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services and the Department of
General Services shall provide an update on the progress of design and construction of the
prerelease unit for women to the Senate Judicial Proceedings Committee, the Senate
Budget and Taxation Committee, the House Judiciary Committee, and the House
Appropriations Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before December 1, 2026, the Office of the Correctional Ombudsman
established under Title 9, Subtitle 40 of the State Government Article shall review and
verify the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services’ progress and submit a
report, including findings and recommendations, to the Senate Judicial Proceedings
Committee and the House Judiciary Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
(b) The Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services shall fully
cooperate with the Office of the Correctional Ombudsman and provide all information, data,
and facility access requested to complete the review required under this section.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.